Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-814
Judicial officeholder; continuance in office; request in writing to be retained.

(1) Any judicial officeholder, subject to the terms of sections 24-813 to 24-818, who desires to continue in office for an additional term, shall indicate his or her desire in this respect in writing filed with the Secretary of State, on or before August 1 immediately preceding the expiration of his or her term in office, and shall request in writing that the Secretary of State submit to the electorate of the appropriate district or area, the question of his or her right to be retained in office for an additional term.

(2) Any written request filed with the Secretary of State shall not be a public record pursuant to section 84-712.01 and shall not be subject to disclosure under sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 or any other provision of law, except that the Secretary of State shall electronically publish a list, that includes the judicial officeholder's name and respective district or area of the state served, of judicial officeholders who have filed for retention in that calendar year.

Laws 1963, c. 125, § 2, p. 477;

Laws 2025, LB166, § 2.